Maine, session 132, LD1374.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §18302, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Botulinum toxin. "Botulinum toxin" means a neurotoxic protein produced by
the bacterium Clostridium botulinum and related species used for various medical and other
purposes, including treating muscle spasms, wrinkles and excessive sweating.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §18302, sub-§17-A is enacted to read:
17-A. Dermal filler. "Dermal filler" means a gel-like substance that is injected
beneath the skin to restore lost volume, smooth lines or soften creases on the face or
enhance facial contours.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §18371, sub-§1, ¶O, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. A, §35,
is amended to read:
O. Administer botulinum toxin or dermal fillers to a patient with a diagnosed dental
condition or when that administration is identified as part of a patient's dental treatment
plan. A dentist who has successfully completed postgraduate training and certification
in oral and maxillofacial surgery from a program accredited by the American Dental
Association Commission on Dental Accreditation or its successor organization and
who has met the requirements of section 18395 may administer botulinum toxin or
dermal fillers in the course of treatment for oral or maxillofacial disease, disfigurement
or disjunction.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §18395 is enacted to read:
§18395. Botulinum toxin or dermal fillers
1. Botulinum toxin or dermal fillers. A dentist may administer botulinum toxin or a
dermal filler for a diagnosed dental condition or as part of a patient's dental treatment
pursuant to this section and section 18371, subsection 1, paragraph O.
2. Additional requirements to administer botulinum toxin or dermal fillers. In
addition to the requirements of section 18371, subsection 1, paragraph O, a dentist may
administer botulinum toxin or a dermal filler if the dentist has completed training accredited
by the American Dental Association's program for continuing education recognition, the
Academy of General Dentistry's program approval for continuing education or another
nationally recognized and accredited training program approved by the board.
A. For botulinum toxin, the dentist must have completed a minimum of 8 hours of
training in the administration of botulinum toxin that includes instruction in the
anatomy of the head and neck, neurophysiology, patient selection, pharmacological
effects and contraindications, management of complications and informed consent
requirements and hands-on training in the administration of botulinum toxin.
B. For a dermal filler, the dentist must have completed a minimum of 8 hours of
training in the administration of a dermal filler that includes instruction in the anatomy
of the head and neck, neurophysiology, patient selection, pharmacological effects and
contraindications, management of complications and informed consent requirements
and hands-on training in the administration of a dermal filler.
3. Administration of botulinum toxin or dermal fillers. Prior to administering
botulinum toxin or a dermal filler, a dentist shall:
Page 1 - 132LR1971(01)

A. Obtain the patient's medical and dental history;
B. Perform a clinical examination; and
C. Obtain the informed consent of the patient.